Utah statutes.
59-12-2209.   Enactment, repeal, or change in the rate of a sales and use
tax under this part -- Annexation -- Notice.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3) or (4), if a county, city, or town
enacts or repeals a sales and use tax or changes the rate of a sales and use
tax under this part, the enactment, repeal, or change shall take effect:
(a)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(b)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (2) from the county, city, or
town.
(2)  The notice described in Subsection (1)(b) shall state:
(a)  that the county, city, or town will enact, repeal, or change the rate of
a sales and use tax under this part;
(b)  the statutory authority for the sales and use tax described in Subsection
(2)(a);
(c)  the date the enactment, repeal, or change will take effect; and
(d)  if the county, city, or town enacts the sales and use tax or changes the
rate of the sales and use tax described in Subsection (2)(a), the rate of the
sales and use tax.
(3) (a)  If the billing period for a transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of a sales and use tax or a tax rate increase under this
part, the enactment of the sales and use tax or the tax rate increase shall
take effect on the first day of the first billing period that begins after the
effective date of the enactment of the sales and use tax or the tax rate
increase.
(b)  If the billing period for a transaction begins before the effective date
of the repeal of a sales and use tax or a tax rate decrease under this part,
the repeal of the sales and use tax or the tax rate decrease shall take effect
on the first day of the last billing period that began before the effective
date of the repeal of the sales and use tax or the tax rate decrease.
(4) (a)  If a sales and use tax due under this part on a catalogue sale is
computed on the basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue,
an enactment, repeal, or change in the rate of a sales and use tax described
in Subsection (1) takes effect:
(i)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(ii)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment, repeal, or
change in the rate of the sales and use tax under Subsection (1).
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
(5)  Except as provided in Subsection (7) or (8), if an annexation will result
in the enactment, repeal, or change in the rate of a sales and use tax under
this part for an annexing area, the enactment, repeal, or change shall take
effect:
(a)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(b)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (6) from the county, city, or
town that annexes the annexing area.
(6)  The notice described in Subsection (5) shall state:
(a)  that the annexation described in Subsection (5) will result in an
enactment, repeal, or change in the rate of a sales and use tax under this
part for the annexing area;
(b)  the statutory authority for the sales and use tax described in Subsection
(6)(a);
(c)  the date the enactment, repeal, or change will take effect; and
(d)  if the annexation will result in the enactment or change in the rate of
the sales and use tax described in Subsection (6)(a), the rate of the sales
and use tax.
(7) (a)  If the billing period for a transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of a sales and use tax or a tax rate increase under this
part, the enactment of the sales and use tax or the tax rate increase shall
take effect on the first day of the first billing period that begins after the
effective date of the enactment of the sales and use tax or the tax rate
increase.
(b)  If the billing period for a transaction begins before the effective date
of the repeal of a sales and use tax or a tax rate decrease under this part,
the repeal of the sales and use tax or the tax rate decrease shall take effect
on the first day of the last billing period that began before the effective
date of the repeal of the sales and use tax or the tax rate decrease.
(8) (a)  If a sales and use tax due under this part on a catalogue sale is
computed on the basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue,
an enactment, repeal, or change in the rate of a sales and use tax described
in Subsection (6) takes effect:
(i)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(ii)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment, repeal, or
change in the rate of the sales and use tax under Subsection (6).
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
